src/pron-myv-morph.txt
LEXICON Misc_Pronouns
се+Dem:се vese-QNT ;
секе+Dem+Pron:секе vese-QNT ; ! This also allows plural
сете+Dem+Pron:сете te-Misc_Pronouns1 ;
севате+Dem+Pron:севате te-Misc_Pronouns1 ;
те+Dem:те te-Misc_Pronouns1 ;
тете+Dem:тете te-Misc_Pronouns1 ;
тевате+Dem:тевате te-Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!
те+Dem+Pron+Gen+Abl:тенде Clitic ;
те+Dem+Pron+Gen+Abe+Use/Sub/Dial:тенстеме Clitic ;
!
истямо+Adn:истямУ2 Misc_Pronouns1 ;
кона+Pron:кона Misc_Pronouns1 ;
коната+Pron:коната Misc_Pronouns1 ;
нона+Dem+Pron:нона Misc_Pronouns_Pl ;
тона+Dem+Pron:тона Misc_Pronouns1 ;
тоната+Dem+Pron:тоната Misc_Pronouns1 ;
! мезе+Pron:мезИ2 Misc_Pronouns1 ;
! мезе+Pron+Indef+Gen:мень Clitic ;
! ки+Pron+Interr:ки Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!не+Dem:не ne-Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!неке+Dem+Pron:неке ne-Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!нете+Dem+Pron:нете Misc_Pronouns1 ;
! Obligatory Possessor Index
!!!!!!!!
!!Periferal
!
ськамонзо+Pron+Exclusive+PerifMod:ськамо kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
ськамнензэ+Pron+Exclusive+PerifMod+Der/не:ськамне kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ; 
ськаминензэ+Pron+Exclusive+PerifMod+Der/не:ськамине kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ; 
ськамнинензэ+Pron+Exclusive+PerifMod+Der/не+Der/не:ськамнине kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ; 

тензэ+Short+Pron+DAT:те PossPX1 ; 
эстензэ+Refl+Pron+Dat:эсте PossPX1 ; 
эськанзо+Refl+Pron+Prl:эська PossPX1 ; 
эськанзо+Refl+Pron+Prl+Prl:эськава PossPX1 ; 
